Louisiana, session 2026, HB238.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
8 Section 1. R.S. 42:1123(31)(c) is hereby repealed in its entirety.
DIGEST
The digest printed below was prepared by House Legislative Services. It constitutes no part
of the legislative instrument. The keyword, one-liner, abstract, and digest do not constitute
part of the law or proof or indicia of legislative intent. [R.S. 1:13(B) and 24:177(E)]
HB 238 Engrossed 2026 Regular Session Zeringue
Abstract: Removes the population restriction on the ethics exceptions authorizing a former
school board member to be employed by his former school board as a classroom
teacher or certified school psychologist.
Present law (R.S. 42:1121) provides that no former member of a board or commission shall,
for a period of two years following the termination of his public service on such board or
commission, contract with, be employed in any capacity by, or be appointed to any position
by that board or commission.
Proposed law retains present law.
Present law (R.S. 42:1123) provides exceptions to the present law prohibition for the
following persons in a parish with a population not in excess of 36,000 people, as
determined by the latest federal decennial census:
Page 1 of 2

HLS 26RS-724 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 238
(1) Any former city, parish, or other local public school board member who holds a valid
La. teaching certificate to be employed by his former school board for any classroom
teacher position with such board which requires a valid La. teaching certificate.
(2) Any former city, parish, or other local school board member who holds a valid
ancillary certificate in school psychology issued by the state Dept. of Education to
be employed by his former school board for any certified school psychologist
position with such board which requires such certificate.
Proposed law retains present law, except to repeal the population limitation, thereby
applying present law exception to all former city, parish, or other local school board
members.
(Repeals R.S. 42:1123(31)(c))
Page 2 of 2